Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1917
Voice stress analysis; license to
operate; applicant; qualifications; affidavit; contents.

(1)
Each applicant for a truth and deception examiner's license to operate a voice
stress analysis instrument shall submit to the Secretary of State a sworn
affidavit that the applicant:

(a) Is at least nineteen years of age;

(b) Is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of
Nebraska;

(c) Has not been under sentence for the commission of a felony within
five years prior to application, including parole, probation, or actual incarceration,
and has never been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor involving moral
turpitude;

(d) Has an academic degree at the baccalaureate level from an accredited
college or university, has at least four years of investigative experience
at the federal, state, political subdivision, or private licensed investigator
level immediately prior to application, or has had at least four years experience
administering voice stress examinations;

(e) Has satisfactorily completed a minimum of sixty classroom hours of formal voice stress
analysis instruction recognized and approved by the secretary and has satisfactorily
completed at least one year of internship training or its equivalent as approved
by the secretary; and

(f) Has not previously had an examiner's license or its equivalent refused
or revoked, or otherwise invalidated for cause duly shown which would also
represent lawful grounds for revoking or denying the applicant's license under the Licensing of Truth and Deception
Examiners Act.

(2) Each applicant shall also:

(a) Provide the secretary with proof that the applicant has completed
a course of study at a training facility approved pursuant to subdivision
(e) of subsection (1) of this section;

(b) Furnish the secretary with satisfactory proof that he or she has
had suitable experience in the personal administration of voice stress analysis
examinations during his or her training course;

(c) Furnish the secretary with completed fingerprint cards, in duplicate,
bearing the applicant's fingerprints and such other identifying information
or certification as to the authenticity thereof as the secretary may reasonably
require; and

(d) After satisfying all of the other requirements of this section,
be required to satisfactorily pass a written examination regarding the voice
stress analysis instruments, conducted by the secretary or under his or her
supervision, given to determine competency to practice as an examiner.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB860, § 1.
July 19, 2012